Washington statutes.
RCW 2.24.030

Salary.

Each court commissioner appointed hereunder shall be allowed a salary, in addition to the fees herein provided for, in such sum as the board of county commissioners may designate, said salary to be paid at the time and in the manner as the salary of other county officials.

[ 1909 c 124 s 4; RRS s 87. Prior: 1895 c 83 s 3.]